District of Columbia statutes.
5-1308

Protection of emergency 2-way radio communications — Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of §§ 5-1306 to 5-1309, upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not more than $500 or imprisonment of not more than 90 days, or both.

Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-105, § 4, 33 DCR 1162
1981 Ed., § 4-1108.